Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 3. Procedure in Civil Cases.

§ 16.1-79.
Actions brought on warrant.

A civil action in a general district court may be brought by warrant directed to the sheriff or to any other person authorized to serve process in such county or city, requiring the person against whom the claim is asserted to appear before the court on a certain day, not exceeding sixty days from the date of service thereof, to answer the complaint of the plaintiff set out in the warrant.
After the warrant has been issued and delivered for service it shall not be altered, nor any blank filled, except by order of the court.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1991, c. 26.

Cross references.

As to service of process in actions brought on warrant, see §

8.01-329

.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.2 Execution. Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-105. Case Disposition; No. 5-712. Warrant in Debt et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Actions, § 2; 2A M.J. Assumpsit, § 2; 5A M.J. Covenant, Action of, § 1; 5C M.J. Debt, Action of, § 1; 13A M.J. Motions for Judgment, § 2.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Petition by unemancipated minors for protective orders. —

A minor may seek an emergency protective order in certain situations, but a minor who has not been emancipated, however mature that individual may be, can seek a protective order only through a next friend. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Charniele L. Herring, Member, House of Delegates, 10-116, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (01/21/11).

Demurrer. —

A demurrer can be filed in both general district courts and circuit courts to challenge the legal sufficiency of a cause of action. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-078,
(2/4/15).

§ 16.1-79.1.
Electronic filing of civil cases.

The general district courts shall accept case data in an electronic format for any civil action filed. The use of the electronic transfer shall be at the option of the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney, and if electronic transfer is utilized, the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney shall comply with the security and data configuration standards established by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court. If electronic transfer is utilized, the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney shall be responsible for filing with the clerk of the general district court the paper copies of any pleading for the proper processing of such civil actions as otherwise required by law, unless the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney has established at his expense a system for the filing of a pleading generated through the electronic transfer of data; such system has been authorized by, and meets the filing requirements of, the clerk; and the plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney transmits the process in an electronic format directly with the sheriff as otherwise provided by law. Notwithstanding any electronic transfer, the plaintiff shall remain responsible for payment of any required fees upon case initiation or filing and as otherwise required by law.

History.

2010, cc. 550, 622; 2011, c. 766.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 766 added “unless the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney has established at his expense a system for the filing of a pleading generated through the electronic transfer of data; such system has been authorized by, and meets the filing requirements of, the clerk; and the plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney transmits the process in an electronic format directly with the sheriff as otherwise provided by law” at the end of the second sentence and added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

§ 16.1-80.
Service of warrant and return thereof.

The officer issuing a warrant shall deliver to the officer to whom it is directed, or to the plaintiff, for service, one or more original warrants and as many copies as there are defendants upon whom it is to be served. Service of the warrant shall be made as provided in Chapter 8 (§

8.01-285

et seq.) of Title 8.01, but the warrant must be served not less than five days before the return day. Returns shall be made on the original, or on one or more of them if there be more than one issued, and shall show when, where, how and upon whom service was made. The warrant or warrants with the returns thereon shall be delivered to the court prior to the return day thereof, but if not so delivered may, in the discretion of the judge of the court, be delivered before the court convenes on the return day.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-81.
Actions brought by motion for judgment.

A civil action in a general district court may be brought by motion for judgment.
Such motion shall be in writing, signed by the plaintiff or his attorney, and shall contain a caption setting forth the name of the court and the title of the action, which shall include the names of all parties and the address of each defendant.
It shall state the facts on which the plaintiff relies, and shall be sufficient if it clearly informs the defendant or defendants of the true nature of the claim asserted. The motion shall notify the defendant or defendants of the day on which such motion shall be made, which day shall not be more than sixty days from the date of service of the motion.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1990, c. 762.

Cross references.

As to service of process in actions brought on motion for judgment, see §

8.01-329

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Actions, §§ 2, 13; 2A M.J. Assumpsit, § 2; 5A M.J. Covenant, Action of, § 1; 5C M.J. Debt, Action of, § 1; 13A M.J. Motions for Judgment, § 4.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Petition by unemancipated minors for protective orders. —

A minor may seek an emergency protective order in certain situations, but a minor who has not been emancipated, however mature that individual may be, can seek a protective order only through a next friend. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Charniele L. Herring, Member, House of Delegates, 10-116, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (01/21/11).

§ 16.1-81.1.
Certain corporations; pro se representation.

When the amount in controversy in any action at law in a general district court does not exceed the sum of $2,500, exclusive of interest, attorney fees contracted for in the instrument, and costs, a corporate plaintiff or defendant, the stock of which is held by no more than five persons and is not publicly offered or planned to be publicly offered at the time of the litigation, may be represented by an officer of that corporation who shall have all the rights and privileges given an individual to represent, plead, and try a case without an attorney, provided that such officer has the unanimous consent of all the shareholders to do so.

History.

2009, c. 666.

§ 16.1-82.
Service of motion; return thereon and delivery to the court; how disposed of.

The plaintiff shall file with the clerk of the court an original motion for judgment and as many copies as there are defendants upon whom it is to be served, with the proper fees.
The original motion and copies thereof shall then be delivered to the sheriff or other person for service.
Service of such motion shall be as provided in Chapter 8 (§

8.01-285

et seq.) of Title 8.01, but the motion must be served not less than five days before the return day. Returns shall be made on the original motion for judgment and shall show when, where, how and upon whom service was made. The motion or motions with the returns thereon shall be returned by the sheriff or other persons making service to the court within three days of the date service is made. The motion for judgment shall be heard and disposed of by the court in the same manner as if it were a civil warrant. Except as otherwise provided herein, procedure upon such motion for judgment shall conform as nearly as practicable to the procedure in motions for judgment prescribed by Rules of Court for civil actions in courts of record.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1981, c. 576; 1990, c. 943.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 38.

§ 16.1-83.
Consent of parties required for trial within five days of service.

No trial of a warrant or motion for judgment under this title may be had within five days after service thereof except with the consent of the parties. Proceedings to enforce the rights and privileges conferred by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.)
shall be conducted within the time limitations specified in §

2.2-3713

.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1990, c. 217.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Process, § 12.

§ 16.1-83.1.
Certification of expert witness opinion at time of service of process.

Every warrant in debt, counter claim, or third party claim in a medical malpractice action, at the time the plaintiff requests service of process upon a defendant, or requests a defendant to accept service of process, shall be deemed a certification that the plaintiff has obtained from an expert whom the plaintiff reasonably believes would qualify as an expert witness pursuant to subsection A of §

8.01-581.20

a written opinion signed by the expert witness that, based upon a reasonable understanding of the facts, the defendant for whom service of process has been requested deviated from the applicable standard of care and the deviation was a proximate cause of the injuries claimed. This certification is not necessary if the plaintiff, in good faith, alleges a medical malpractice action that asserts a theory of liability where expert testimony is unnecessary because the alleged act of negligence clearly lies within the range of the jury’s common knowledge and experience.

The certifying expert shall not be required to be an expert witness expected to testify at trial nor shall any defendant be entitled to discover the identity or qualifications of the certifying expert or the nature of the certifying expert opinions. Should the certifying expert be identified as an expert expected to testify at trial, the opinions and bases therefor shall be discoverable pursuant to Rule 4:1 of the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia with the exception of the expert’s status as a certifying expert.

Upon written request of any defendant, the plaintiff shall, within 10 business days after receipt of such request, provide the defendant with a certification form which affirms that the plaintiff had obtained the necessary certifying expert opinion at the time service was requested or affirms that the plaintiff did not need to obtain a certifying expert opinion. The court, upon good cause shown, may conduct an in camera review of the certifying expert opinion obtained by the plaintiff as the court may deem appropriate. If the plaintiff did not obtain a necessary certifying expert opinion at the time the plaintiff requested service of process on a defendant, the court shall impose sanctions according to the provisions of §

8.01-271.1

and may dismiss the case with prejudice.

History.

2005, cc. 649, 692; 2007, c. 489; 2013, cc. 65, 610.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 489 inserted “or requests a defendant to accept service of process” preceding “shall be deemed” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; and inserted “or qualifications” following “identity” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 65 and 610 are identical, and added the second sentence of the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For Survey article, see “Civil Practice and Procedure,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

§ 16.1-84.
When action or proceeding not lost; when matured for hearing.

In the event the return day of any civil action or other proceeding is a day on which the court does not sit, such action or proceeding shall not be lost, but shall be deemed matured for hearing or other disposition by the court on the first day thereafter on which the court sits for hearing civil actions.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 210.

§ 16.1-85.
What term “warrant” to include.

Whenever the word “warrant” is used in any section of the Code or act of assembly relating to civil proceedings, it shall, unless the context or use indicates a different meaning, be construed to mean “warrant or motion for judgment.”

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-86.
When action deemed brought.

A civil action on a warrant in a district court shall be deemed brought when the memorandum required by §

8.01-290

is filed with the clerk, magistrate, or other officer authorized to issue warrants and the required fee is paid. The officer issuing the warrant shall note on the memorandum the date and time it is received by him with the required fee.

A civil action on a motion for judgment as authorized in §

16.1-81

shall be deemed brought on the day on which the motion is filed with the court.

Whenever any other pleading in any civil action is filed in a district court, the clerk or his designee shall stamp or mark the date received and time of filing on the face of such pleading.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1980, c. 739; 1990, c. 109.

§ 16.1-86.1.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 109.

§ 16.1-87.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to retention and disposition of district court records, see §

16.1-69.53

et seq.

§ 16.1-88.
Procedure when plaintiff sues on sworn claim.

If a civil action in a general district court is upon a contract, express or implied, for the payment of money, or unlawful detainer pursuant to §

55.1-1245

or

55.1-1415

for the payment of money or possession of the premises, or both, or is brought by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision or agency thereof for the collection of taxes or to enforce any other obligation for the payment of money, an affidavit and a copy of the account if there be one and, in actions pursuant to §

55.1-1245

or

55.1-1415

, proof of required notice may be made and served on the defendant in accordance with §

8.01-296

with the warrant or motion for judgment as provided in §

8.01-28

for actions at law, whereupon the provisions of §

8.01-28

shall be applicable to the further proceedings therein. The affidavit and the account if there is one and proof of appropriate notice may be attached to the warrant or motion, in which event the combined papers shall be served as a single paper.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1973, c. 440; 1991, c. 503.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1245

or

55.1-1415

” for “§ 55-225 or 55-248.31.”

§ 16.1-88.01.
Counterclaims.

In any proceeding before any general district court a defendant may, at his option, at any time before trial, plead in writing as a counterclaim, any cause of action at law for a money judgment in personam, or any matter which would entitle him to relief in equity in the nature of damages, that he has against the plaintiff or all plaintiffs jointly, whether or not it grows out of any transaction mentioned in the warrant or notice of motion for judgment, whether or not it is for liquidated damages, whether or not it is in tort or contract, and whether or not the amount demanded exceeds the amount claimed by the plaintiff in the warrant or notice of motion for judgment; however, no such counterclaim shall be filed or heard when the amount claimed therein exceeds the amount within the jurisdiction of such court.

Upon the request of either party, bills of particulars and grounds of defense may be ordered to ensure a fair trial on the merits of the issue presented. The court may, in its discretion, hear the counterclaim together with the original case, or may order and hold a separate hearing of any cause of action asserted in a counterclaim. In either event, the court shall render such final judgment on the whole case as the law and the evidence require.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-239.1; 1954, c. 608; 1977, c. 624; 1998, cc. 482, 495.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 482 and 495 are identical, and in the first paragraph, deleted “provided” preceding “however” and deleted “that” following “however,” and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “either party” for “the respective parties,” deleted “in the discretion of the general district court” following “may be ordered” and substituted “ensure” for “insure.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 62, 363; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 33; 5A M.J. Counties, § 83; 16 M.J. Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 1.

§ 16.1-88.02.
Cross-claims.

Subject to the jurisdictional limitations prescribed by law, in any proceeding before a general district court a defendant may, at his option, at any time before trial, plead in writing as a cross-claim any cause of action that he has against one or more defendants growing out of any matter pleaded in the plaintiff’s warrant or notice or motion for judgment. The court may order and hold a separate hearing upon any cause of action asserted in a cross-claim.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-239.2; 1954, c. 608; 1977, c. 624.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 33; 5A M.J. Counties, § 83; 16 M.J. Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 1. 16 M.J. Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 1.

§ 16.1-88.03.
Pleadings and other papers by certain parties not represented by attorneys.

Any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, professional corporation, professional limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, registered limited liability limited partnership or business trust, the Fort Monroe Authority, and the Department of Military Affairs, when the amount claimed in any civil action pursuant to subdivision (1) or (3) of §

16.1-77

does not exceed the jurisdictional amounts authorized in such subsections, exclusive of interest, may prepare, execute, file, and have served on other parties in any proceeding in a general district court a warrant in debt, motion for judgment, warrant in detinue, distress warrant, summons for unlawful detainer, counterclaim, crossclaim, suggestion for summons in garnishment, garnishment summons, order of possession, writ of eviction, writ of fieri facias, interpleader and civil appeal notice without the intervention of an attorney. Such papers may be signed by a corporate officer, a manager of a limited liability company, a general partner of any form of partnership or a trustee of any business trust, or such corporate officer, with the approval of the board of directors, or manager, general partner or trustee may authorize in writing an employee, a person licensed under the provisions of §

54.1-2106.1

, or the property manager or the managing agent of a landlord as defined in §

55.1-1200

pursuant to the written property management agreement to sign such papers as the agent of the business entity. Only an agency employee designated in writing by the Adjutant General may sign such papers on behalf of the Department of Military Affairs. However, this section shall not apply to an action under subdivision (1) or (3) of §

16.1-77

which was assigned to a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, professional corporation, professional limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, registered limited liability limited partnership or business trust, or individual solely for the purpose of enforcing an obligation owed or right inuring to another.

Nothing in this section shall allow a nonlawyer to file a bill of particulars or grounds of defense or to argue motions, issue a subpoena, rule to show cause, or capias; file or interrogate at debtor interrogatories; or to file, issue or argue any other paper, pleading or proceeding not set forth in subsection A.

The provisions of §

8.01-271.1

shall apply to any pleading, motion or other paper filed or made pursuant to this section.

Parties not represented by counsel, and who have made an appearance in the case, shall promptly notify in writing the clerk of court wherein the litigation is pending, and any adverse party, of any change in the party’s address necessary for accurate mailing or service of any pleadings or notices. In the absence of such notification, a mailing to or service upon a party at the most recent address contained in the court file of the case shall be deemed effective service or other notice.

History.

1990, c. 645; 1992, c. 814; 1993, cc. 473, 478; 2003, cc. 665, 667; 2004, cc. 338, 365; 2005, c. 136; 2006, c. 374; 2017, c. 690; 2019, cc. 180, 477, 700; 2020, cc. 84, 194.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-1200” for “55-248.4.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 665 and 667 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, professional corporation, professional limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, registered limited liability limited partnership or business trust, when” for “Any corporation or partnership, when” at the beginning of the first sentence, rewrote the second sentence, and inserted “limited liability company, limited partnership, professional corporation, professional limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, registered limited liability limited partnership or business trust” in the third sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 338, in subsection A, substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in the first sentence, added the language beginning “or such corporate officer” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “subdivision (1) or (3) of §

16.1-77

” for “§

16.1-77 (1)

or (3)” in the last sentence.

The 2004 amendment by c. 365 inserted the language beginning “or such corporate officer” at the end of the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by 136 added subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 374 inserted “and who have made an appearance in the case” in subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 690 inserted “and the Department of Military Affairs” in the first sentence and added the third sentence in subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 180 and 700 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “order of possession, writ of eviction” for “writ of possession.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 477 inserted “pursuant to the written property management agreement” and made stylistic changes in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 84 and 194 are identical, and inserted “the Fort Monroe Authority” in the first sentence in subsection A.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of civil practice and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2004).

For article reviewing recent developments and changes in legislation, case law, and Virginia Supreme Court Rules affecting civil litigation, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 95 (2005).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Corporations. —

Appeal was dismissed for lack of jurisdiction because appeal that was filed by counsel applied only to an individual, and the corporations were not properly before the court of appeals; the individual’s motion for a new trial was only effective as to him and without effect to the corporations. Cajiao v. Warren, 90 Va. Cir. 64, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 147 (Norfolk July 2, 2015).

§ 16.1-88.1.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 183.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to affidavit regarding damages to motor vehicle, see §

8.01-416

.

§ 16.1-88.2.
Evidence of medical reports, statements, or records; testimony of health care provider or custodian of records.

In a civil suit tried in a general district court or appealed to the circuit court to recover damages for personal injuries or to resolve any dispute with an insurance company or health care provider, either party may present evidence as to the extent, nature, and treatment of the injury, the examination of the person so injured, and the costs of such treatment and examination by the following:

A report or statement from the treating or examining health care provider as defined in §

8.01-581.1

or a health care provider licensed outside of the Commonwealth for his treatment of the plaintiff outside of the Commonwealth. Such report or statement shall be admitted if the party intending to present such evidence gives the opposing party or parties a copy of such evidence and written notice of such intention 10 days in advance of trial and if attached to or contained in such evidence is a sworn declaration of (i) the treating or examining health care provider that (a) the person named therein was treated or examined by such health care provider, (b) the information contained in the report or statement is true and accurate and fully descriptive as to the nature and extent of the injury, and (c) any statement of costs contained in the report or statement is true and accurate or (ii) the custodian of such report or statement that the same is a true and accurate copy of the report or statement; or

The bills as defined in subsection A of §

8.01-413.01

or records of a treating or examining health care provider as defined in §

8.01-581.1

or a health care provider licensed outside of the Commonwealth for its treatment of the plaintiff outside of the Commonwealth. Such provider’s records or bills shall be admitted if (i) the party intending to present evidence by the use of records or bills gives the opposing party or parties a copy of the records or bills and written notice of such intention 10 days in advance of trial and (ii) attached to the records or bills is a sworn declaration of the custodian thereof that the same is a true and accurate copy of the records or bills of such provider.

If, thereafter, the plaintiff or defendant summons the health care provider or custodian making such statement to testify in proper person or by deposition, the court shall determine which party shall pay the fee and costs for such appearance or depositions, or may apportion the same among the parties in such proportions as the ends of justice may require. If such health care provider or custodian is not subject to subpoena for cross-examination in court or by a deposition, then the court shall allow a reasonable opportunity for the party seeking the subpoena for such health care provider or custodian to obtain his testimony as the ends of justice may require. The plaintiff may only present evidence pursuant to this section in circuit court if he has not requested an amount in excess of the ad damnum in the motion for judgment filed in the general district court.

History.

1978, c. 490; 1983, c. 616; 1985, c. 379; 1989, c. 563; 1990, c. 279; 1996, c. 749; 2005, c. 811; 2007, cc. 425, 869; 2013, cc. 78, 145; 2014, cc. 25, 85, 446; 2022, cc. 469, 470.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 811, in the first sentence, inserted “or filed in a general district court and removed to circuit court where the claim does not exceed the jurisdictional amount set forth in §

16.1-77

” and substituted “10” for “ten.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 425 inserted “or appealed to the circuit court by any defendant” near the beginning of the first sentence.

The 2007 amendment by c. 869 deleted “or filed in a general district court and removed to circuit court where the claim does not exceed the jurisdictional amount set forth in §

16.1-77

” from the first sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 78 deleted “by any defendant” following “circuit court” near the beginning of the first sentence; and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendment by c. 145 restructured the section by inserting “the following:” at the end of the introductory paragraph and adding the subdivision designations; in subdivision 1, deleted “and the records of a hospital or similar medical facility at which the treatment or examination was performed” following “8.01-581.1”; in subdivision 2, added the first sentence, twice substituted “records or bills” for “record,” inserted clause (i) and the clause (ii) designator, and substituted “the records or bills” for “it” in clause (ii); and in the last paragraph, deleted “taken de bene esse” following “or by deposition” in the first sentence, and deleted “de bene esse” following “by a deposition” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 25 and 446 are identical, and in subdivision 1 added “or a health care provider licensed outside of the Commonwealth for his treatment of the plaintiff outside of the Commonwealth” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2014 amendment by c. 85, in subdivision 1 redesignated clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) as (a), (b), and (c), inserted the clause (i) designator, and inserted “or (ii) the custodian of such report that the same is a true and accurate copy of the report”; and made related changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 469 and 470 are identical, and in subdivision 1, inserted “or statement” in the first sentence, and substituted “Such report or statement shall be admitted if the party intending to present such evidence gives the opposing party or parties a copy of such evidence and written notice of such intention 10 days in advance of trial and if attached to or contained in such evidence is a sworn declaration of” for “Such medical report shall be admitted if the party intending to present evidence by the use of a report gives the opposing party or parties a copy of the report and written notice of such intention 10 days in advance of trial and if attached to such report is a sworn statement of” in the second sentence; in subdivision 2, rewrote the first sentence, which read: “The records or bills of a hospital or similar medical facility at which the treatment or examination was performed”; and in the second sentence, substituted “provider’s” and “provider” for the occurrences of “hospital or other medical facility” and substituted “declaration” for “statement.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

§ 16.1-89.
Subpoena duces tecum; attorney-issued subpoena duces tecum.

A judge or clerk of a district court may issue a subpoena duces tecum pursuant to the terms of Rule 4:9A of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia except that such subpoena may be directed to a party to the case as well as to a person who is not a party.

Subpoenas duces tecum for medical records issued by an attorney shall be subject to the provisions of §§

8.01-413

and

32.1-127.1:03

except that no separate fee for issuance shall be imposed.

A subpoena duces tecum may also be issued by an attorney-at-law who is an active member of the Virginia State Bar at the time of issuance, as an officer of the court. Any such subpoena duces tecum shall be on a form approved by the Committee on District Courts, signed by the attorney as if a pleading and shall include the attorney’s address. A copy, together with the attorney’s certificate of service pursuant to Rule 1:12, shall be mailed or delivered to the clerk’s office of the court in which the case is pending on the day of issuance by the attorney. The law governing subpoenas duces tecum issued by a clerk shall apply mutatis mutandis, except that attorneys may not issue subpoenas duces tecum in those cases in which they may not issue a summons as provided in §

8.01-407

. A sheriff shall not be required to serve an attorney-issued subpoena that is not issued at least five business days prior to the date production of evidence is desired. When an attorney-at-law transmits one or more subpoenas duces tecum to a sheriff to be served in his jurisdiction, the provisions in §

8.01-407

regarding such transmittals shall apply.

If the time for compliance with a subpoena duces tecum issued by an attorney is less than 14 days after service of the subpoena, the person to whom it is directed may serve upon the party issuing the subpoena a written objection setting forth any grounds upon which such production, inspection or testing should not be had. If objection is made, the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued and served shall not be entitled to the requested production, inspection or testing, except pursuant to an order of the court, but may, upon notice to the person to whom the subpoena was directed, move for an order to compel production, inspection or testing. Upon such timely motion, the court may quash, modify or sustain the subpoena.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1979, c. 668; 1984, c. 500; 1986, c. 160; 2000, c. 813; 2004, c. 335.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 813, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Bar Association, with the support of the Virginia Sheriffs Association and such other organizations from which it may request assistance, shall conduct a study of the effectiveness of this act and report its findings to the General Assembly no later than January 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, cc. 514 and 551 repealed Acts 2000, c. 813, cl. 2 which had provided: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2001, unless reenacted by the 2001 General Assembly. Any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued by an attorney in compliance with this act shall remain valid notwithstanding the expiration of this act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Rule 4:9 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia” has been changed to “Rule 4:9A of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 813 added the second, third, and fourth paragraphs.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 335 divided the former fourth sentence into the present fourth and fifth sentences by substituting “A sheriff shall not be required to serve an attorney-issued subpoena that is not issued at least” for “and may not issue a subpoena duces tecum less than” in the third paragraph; substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the first sentence of the last paragraph; and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on evidence for year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1451 (1978).

§ 16.1-90.
Recognizance upon continuation of case.

Judges of courts not of record may, upon the continuance of any case, require the witnesses or any of them, to enter into recognizance in such penalty as the judge may deem proper, either with or without security, for their appearance at a subsequent date to give evidence in the case, such recognizance to conform to the requirements of §§

19.2-135

through

19.2-137

for taking recognizance of witnesses.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1960, c. 372.

§ 16.1-91.
Repealed by Acts 1984, c. 25.

§ 16.1-91.1.
Costs to be included in judgment on forthcoming bond.

The judge of a general district court, on giving judgment on a forthcoming bond, shall include in the costs of the judgment the clerk’s fee as stated in subdivision A 21 of §

17.1-275

; and the clerk shall not receive any fee or reward for any service he is required to perform by the provisions of §

8.01-529

, except that specified in subdivision A 21 of §

17.1-275

.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-460; 1962, c. 10; 1977, c. 624.

§ 16.1-91.2.
Judge to keep record of judgment on forthcoming bond; how to endorse execution.

The judge of the general district court, rendering a judgment under the provisions of Chapter 19 (§

8.01-526

et seq.) of Title 8.01, shall keep a record thereof in the same manner as he is required by law in other cases. He shall not stay execution upon such judgment, and shall endorse on any fieri facias issued thereon “no security is to be taken.”

History.

Code 1950, § 8-461; 1962, c. 10; 1977, c. 624.

§ 16.1-92.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 869, cl. 2.

§ 16.1-93.
Principles applicable to trial of cases.

Every action or other proceeding in a court not of record shall be tried according to the principles of law and equity, and when the same conflict the principles of equity shall prevail. No warrant, motion or other pleading shall be dismissed by reason of a mere defect, irregularity or omission in the proceedings or in the form of the pleadings when the same may be corrected by an order of the court. The court may direct such proceedings and enter such orders as may be necessary to correct any such defects, irregularities and omissions, and to bring about a trial of the merits of the controversy and promote substantial justice to all parties. The court may make such provisions as to costs and continuances as may be just.

History.

1956, c. 555.

Cross references.

For provision on amendment of written pleadings, see Rule 8:8, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

§ 16.1-93.1.
Use of telephonic communication systems or electronic video and audio communication systems to conduct hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any proceeding under this chapter in which a party or witness is incarcerated or when otherwise authorized by the court, the court may, in its discretion, conduct any hearing using a telephonic communication system or an electronic audio and video communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any electronic audio and video communication system used to conduct such a hearing shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

2001, c. 513.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).